test/src/morphology/V-ansted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - äˊnsted: # Verb 'to steal' - full paradigm
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äˊnstam
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: äˊnstak
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ääˊnast
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: äˊnstep
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: äˊnsteˊped
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: äˊnste 
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prs+4: äˊnstet

     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: äˊnstem
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: äˊnstiǩ
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: äˊnsti
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [äˊnstim, äˊnstin]
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: äˊnstid
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: äˊnste
     äˊnsted+V+Ind+Prt+4: äˊnsteš

     äˊnsted+V+Pot+Sg1: äˊnsteˊžem
     äˊnsted+V+Pot+Sg2: äˊnsteˊžiǩ
     äˊnsted+V+Pot+Sg3: äˊnstež
     äˊnsted+V+Pot+Pl1: [äˊnsteˊžep, äˊnsteˊžim]
     äˊnsted+V+Pot+Pl2: äˊnsteˊžid 
     äˊnsted+V+Pot+Pl3: äˊnsteˊže
     äˊnsted+V+Pot+4: äˊnsteˊžet
     äˊnsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: äˊnsteˊže

     äˊnsted+V+Cond+Sg1: äˊnsteˊčem
     äˊnsted+V+Cond+Sg2: äˊnsteˊčiǩ
     äˊnsted+V+Cond+Sg3: äˊnsteˊči
     äˊnsted+V+Cond+Pl1: [äˊnsteˊčim, äˊnsteˊčep]
     äˊnsted+V+Cond+Pl2: äˊnsteˊčid
     äˊnsted+V+Cond+Pl3: äˊnsteˊče
     äˊnsted+V+Cond+4: äˊnsteˊčeš
     äˊnsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: äˊnsteˊče

     äˊnsted+V+Imp+Sg2: ääˊnest
     äˊnsted+V+Imp+Sg3: äˊnstââǥǥas
     äˊnsted+V+Imp+Pl1: äˊnstâkap
     äˊnsted+V+Imp+Pl2: äˊnsteˊǩed
     äˊnsted+V+Imp+Pl3: äˊnstâkaz
     äˊnsted+V+Imp+ConNeg: äˊnstuku
     äˊnsted+V+ActEss: äˊnsteˊmen
     äˊnsted+V+Action: äˊnstam
     äˊnsted+V+PrsPrc: äˊnsteei
     äˊnsted+V+PrfPrc: äˊnstam
     äˊnsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [äˊnstummu, äˊnstuum, äˊnstum]
# deduced from Sammallahti/Mosnikoff 1991 -ummu, -uum and -um occur as variants
     äˊnsted+V+VAbess: äˊnsteǩâni
     äˊnsted+V+GerTemp: äˊnsteen
     äˊnsted+V+GerInstr: äˊnsteeˊl
